Utah statutes.
48-2a-301.   Admission of additional limited partners.

(1)  A person becomes a limited partner on the later of:

(a)  the date the original certificate of limited partnership is filed; or

(b)  the date stated in the records of the limited partnership as the date that person becomes a limited partner.

(2)  After the filing of a limited partnership's original certificate of limited partnership, a person may be admitted as an additional limited partner:

(a)  in the case of a person acquiring a partnership interest directly from the limited partnership or in the case of an assignee of a partnership interest of a partner who does not have authority, as provided in Section 48-2a-704, to grant the assignee the right to become a limited partner, upon compliance with the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not so provide, upon the written consent of all partners; and

(b)  in the case of an assignee of a partnership interest of a partner who has the authority, as provided in Section 48-2a-704, to grant the assignee the right to become a limited partner, upon the exercise of that authority and compliance with any conditions limiting the grant or exercise of the authority.



Amended by Chapter 189, 1991 General Session

